Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-269
Offstreet parking; necessity.

State recognition is hereby given to the hazard created in the streets of cities of the primary class of Nebraska by the great increase in the number of motor vehicles, including cars, buses, and trucks. In order to remove or reduce the hazards to life and property and the inconvenience of congested traffic on the streets in such cities in this state, it is deemed necessary and of general benefit to the entire State of Nebraska to provide means for such cities in Nebraska to own offstreet parking facilities for the parking of motor vehicles.

Laws 1967, c. 51, § 1, p. 185.

For other provisions on offstreet parking, see section 19-3301 et seq.